Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1554.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 20j-1A of Title 74, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section:


1. “Asylum seeker” means any alien who has applied for asylum


under 8 U.S.C., Section 1158 or withholding of removal, regardless


of the pendency or outcome of such application;


2. “Illegal immigrant” means any alien who is present in the


United States without lawful immigration status including, but not


limited to, those who entered without inspection or who have


overstayed a visa;

Req. No. 3439 Page 1


3. “Material support” means food, shelter, housing,


transportation, legal services, medical care, financial assistance,


or any other tangible aid or resource, directly or indirectly, that


facilitates the presence, resettlement, or integration of


individuals described in paragraph 2 of this subsection within this


state;


4. “Nongovernmental organization” or “NGO” means any nonprofit


corporation, association, or organization organized under the laws


of this state or any other state including, but not limited to,


charitable organizations, faith-based organizations, and advocacy


groups; and


5. “State or local funding” means any grant, contract, subsidy,


loan, or other financial assistance provided by this state, any


state agency, or any political subdivision including counties,


municipalities, or school districts.


B. No NGO shall knowingly or recklessly provide material


support for the benefit of any illegal immigrant or asylum seeker


within this state. Any NGO that violates this subsection shall be


permanently ineligible to receive any state or local funding.


C. In addition to the penalty provided in subsection B of this


section:


1. Any officer, director, employee, or agent of an NGO who


knowingly participates in or directs a violation of subsection B of


this section shall be guilty of a felony, punishable upon conviction

Req. No. 3439 Page 2


by imprisonment in the custody of the Department of Corrections for


not less than one (1) year nor more than five (5) years, by a fine


not to exceed Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00), or by both such


imprisonment and fine; and


2. The Attorney General, any district attorney, or any affected


state agency may bring a civil action to enjoin violations of this


section and to recover any state or local funds previously disbursed


to the violating NGO.


D. This section shall not apply to law enforcement activities


or criminal investigations.


SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-3439 BLB 1/12/2026 6:07:42 PM

















Req. No. 3439 Page 3